Hawaii statutes.
[§195D-5.5] Products to support the
environment. (a) There is established within the department a program to
financially benefit the environment by the development of
environmentally-themed products such as collectible stamps, credit cards, and
coins to be commercially sold to the public. The department may enter into
contracts with private entities for the production of existing and new
environmentally-themed products as the department deems appropriate.

(b) Each product developed under this program
shall require the approval of the chairperson of the board of land and natural
resources and the governor, after consultation with appropriate environmental
organizations.

(c) Except for direct costs to administer,
produce, and market the products, all revenues from the sale of products under
this section shall be paid into the endangered species trust fund established
pursuant to section 195D-31 to support programs of the department that:

(1) Benefit the environment; and

(2) Are related to the environmental theme of the
product sold.

(d) The department shall submit an annual
report of the program's products, costs, and revenues to the legislature no
later than twenty days before the convening of each regular session. [L 2002, c
186, §2]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to chapter 195 but is
renumbered to this chapter pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next